Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-2305
Municipal parking facility; contract or agreement on operation and enforcement; authorized.

(1) Any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village may enter into contracts or agreements with any person, firm, corporation, or political subdivision for the operation, maintenance, management, or enforcement of municipal parking facilities, including onstreet metered parking and offstreet public lots or garages.

(2) Such contracts or agreements may authorize the person, firm, corporation, or political subdivision to issue and process parking citations, collect fines, maintain equipment, or operate payment systems, provided that the city or village retains final authority over adjudication and appeals.

(3) The city or village shall retain sufficient control over the parking facilities to ensure proper operation in the public interest and to establish or approve all rates, charges, and fines.

(4) No contract or agreement under this section shall exceed:

(a) Thirty years in duration, including renewals, for a city of the first class; or

(b) Ten years in duration, including renewals, for a city of the second class or village.

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 6.
July 18, 2026